Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-1706. Civil penalties.

The State of Arkansas and the Attorney General may institute a civil action against any long-term care facility caregiver necessary to enforce any provision of this subchapter.

Notwithstanding any criminal penalties assessed, any caregiver against whom any civil judgment is entered as the result of a civil action brought by the State of Arkansas through the Attorney General on a complaint alleging that caregiver to have abused, neglected, or exploited an endangered person or an impaired person in a long-term care facility certified under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2005, shall be subject to pay a civil penalty:

Not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation judicially found to have occurred; or

Not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for the death of a long-term care facility resident that results from a single violation.

The Attorney General shall not be precluded from recovering civil penalties under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section for the death of a person that results from multiple violations.

However, the Attorney General may not recover civil penalties under both subdivisions (a)(2)(A) and (B) of this section.

In any action brought under this section, the Attorney General shall be required to prove all essential elements of the cause of action, including damages, by a preponderance of the evidence.

Any civil penalty under subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund.

Any caregiver against whom any civil judgment is entered as the result of a civil action under this section by the Attorney General shall be required to pay to the Attorney General all reasonable expenses that the court determines have been necessarily incurred in the enforcement of this subchapter.

A civil action under this section may not be brought more than three (3) years after the date on which the violation of this subchapter is committed.

Upon registration of a hotline report of suspected adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment, the hotline shall refer the matter immediately to the appropriate investigating agency as outlined in this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (d).

The 2017 amendment added “with the exception of an employee working with an ombudsman program established by the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services, in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2017” to the end of (a)(1)(R).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 531 added (a)(1)(AA).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Breanna Trombley, Note: Criminal Law — No Stitches for Snitches: The Need for a Duty-to-Report Law in Arkansas, 34 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 813 (2012).

Where a nursing home employee was terminated based on reports of improper sexual contact with a male resident, the employee's discrimination claims failed because the employee did not show pretext; the employee's libel claims failed because there was no evidence to support the claim that any of the defendants defamed the employee by falsely stating that the employee initiated the sexual contact with the resident.Evance v. Trumann Health Servs., LLC, 719 F.3d 673 (8th Cir.), cert. denied, — U.S. —, 134 S. Ct. 799, 187 L. Ed. 2d 596 (2013).

Reasonable cause exists to believe the death resulted from maltreatment; or

Upon request of the department and there is a pending investigation concerning allegations of maltreatment occurring before death.

All cases of suspected adult maltreatment if the act or omission occurs in a place other than a long-term care facility; and

All cases of suspected adult maltreatment of an adult endangered person or an adult impaired person if a family member of the adult endangered person or adult impaired person is named as the suspected offender, regardless of whether or not the adult endangered person or adult impaired person is a long-term care facility resident.

The department shall investigate all cases of suspected maltreatment of a long-term care facility resident.

If requested by the department, a law enforcement agency possessing jurisdiction shall assist in the investigation of any case of suspected adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment, including accompanying the department's investigator if the department has a reasonable belief that the investigator's safety could be compromised.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “department” for “Office of Long Term Care” in (b)(2).

Unambiguous language of the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Act, §12-12-1701 et seq., placed the responsibility to conduct a thorough investigation of allegations of abuse squarely on the Department of Human Services (DHS), not the nursing home or long-term care facility, and nothing in the statutory provisions authorized DHS to delegate the responsibility, via its rulemaking authority, to the nursing home in which the abuse was alleged to have taken place.Williform v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 314, 551 S.W.3d 401 (2018).

The nature, extent, and cause of the adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment;

The identity of the person responsible;

The names and conditions of other adults in the home, if the incident occurred in a home;

An evaluation of the persons responsible for the care of the maltreated person, if any;

The home environment, the relationship of the maltreated person to the next of kin or other person responsible for his or her care, and all other pertinent data; and

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (b)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted “adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment” for “maltreatment” in (b)(3)(A); and, in (b)(3)(F)(i), substituted “If the incident occurred in the home, a visit” for “A visit”, substituted “maltreated person's home and an interview” for “maltreated adult's home, if the incident occurred in the home, and an interview”, and substituted “person” for “adult”.

Unambiguous language of the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Act, §12-12-1701 et seq., placed the responsibility to conduct a thorough investigation of allegations of abuse squarely on the Department of Human Services (DHS), not the nursing home or long-term care facility, and nothing in the statutory provisions authorized DHS to delegate the responsibility, via its rulemaking authority, to the nursing home in which the abuse was alleged to have taken place.Williform v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 314, 551 S.W.3d 401 (2018).

Department of Human Services's (DHS's) decision finding that a certified nursing assistant perpetrated an act of abuse on a resident of a long-term care facility was reversed where the facility administrator conducted the investigation, not DHS, and thus DHS had violated the statutory provisions.Williform v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 314, 551 S.W.3d 401 (2018).

If the incident occurred in the home, a visit to the maltreated person's home and an interview with the maltreated person.

An investigator shall interview the maltreated person alone and out of the hearing of any next of kin or other person responsible for the maltreated person's care.

If necessary, an interpreter may be present during the interview of the maltreated person.

Any person who is required to report a case of adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment may take or cause to be taken, at public expense, color photographs of the area of trauma visible on the maltreated person and, if medically indicated, cause to be performed radiological examination of the maltreated person.

(1)Whenever a person is required to report under this subchapter in his or her capacity as a member of the staff of any private or public institution or agency, he or she shall immediately notify the person in charge of the institution or agency or his or her designee.

Take or cause to be taken, at public expense, color photographs of physical trauma; and

If medically indicated, cause to be performed a radiological examination of the maltreated person.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added the (c)(1) designation; inserted “under this section” in (c)(1); and added (c)(2).

(1)Any photograph or X-ray taken under this section shall be sent to the Department of Human Services as soon as possible.

Any person, official, or institution acting in good faith in the making of a report, the taking of a photograph, or the removal of a maltreated person under this subchapter shall have immunity from liability and suit for damages, civil or criminal, that otherwise might result by reason of those actions.

The good faith of any person required to report a case of adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment shall be presumed.

If admission cannot be obtained to a home, an institution, or other place in which an allegedly maltreated person may be present, a circuit court, upon good cause shown, shall order the person responsible for or in charge of the home, institution, or other place to allow entrance for an examination and investigation.

If admission to a home cannot be obtained due to hospitalization or similar absence of the maltreated person and admission to the home is necessary to complete an investigation, a circuit court, upon good cause shown, shall order a law enforcement agency to assist the Department of Human Services to obtain entrance to the home for the required investigation of the home environment.

(1)Upon request, the medical, mental health, or other records regarding the maltreated person, including protected health information, maintained by any facility or maintained by any person required by this subchapter to report suspected adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment, shall be made available to the department for the purpose of conducting an investigation under this subchapter.

The department is not required to pay for a copy of a medical, mental health, financial, or other record that is provided to the department under this subsection.

No fees may be charged or collected by the clerk, including without limitation, fees for filing, summons, or subpoenas.

(A)The department may compel the allegedly maltreated person to be evaluated in the least restrictive environment and least intrusive manner necessary to obtain an assessment if:

The department is unable to secure an order of investigation from the circuit court during regular business hours;

The department has reasonable cause to suspect a significant risk for serious harm to the health or safety of the adult; and

The department cannot adequately assess:

The adult’s capacity to comprehend the nature and consequences of remaining in the situation or condition; or

The adult’s mental or physical impairment and ability to protect himself or herself from maltreatment.

Upon request by the department and without a court order, law enforcement and medical personnel shall assist the department as needed in obtaining an assessment on an allegedly maltreated person.

The assessment may include emergency treatment.

No later than the next business day after the assessment, the department shall petition the court for an order of investigation as outlined in this section.

(A)Upon a showing of reasonable cause to suspect an allegedly maltreated person is endangered or impaired, the circuit court shall issue an order of investigation.

The order of investigation may include the power to compel the allegedly maltreated person to be assessed to determine whether the person:

Lacks capacity to understand the nature and consequences of remaining in the situation or condition that poses a danger to the person; or

Has a mental or physical impairment such that the person is unable to protect himself or herself from abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

Upon good cause shown by the department, the circuit court may order emergency treatment of the allegedly maltreated adult.

The allegedly maltreated adult has a right to counsel, including appointed counsel if indigent, and a right to a hearing within five (5) business days after the allegedly maltreated adult is served with the ex parte order of investigation.

If the allegedly maltreated adult is not indigent, the circuit court has the authority to appoint counsel to represent the allegedly maltreated adult and to direct payment from the assets of the adult for legal services received by the adult.

If the department determines the allegedly maltreated adult is not endangered or impaired and releases the allegedly maltreated adult or ceases any assessment, a hearing under subdivision (d)(6)(A) of this section is not required.

At the five-day hearing the court shall determine whether the order of investigation shall continue for an additional period of time or be terminated.

The burden shall be upon the department to show probable cause that the alleged maltreated person is an endangered or impaired person and that additional time is necessary to complete the investigation.

The department and the court shall defer to any declaration executed in conformance with the Arkansas Rights of the Terminally Ill or Permanently Unconscious Act, § 20-17-201 et seq., and before any documented medical or judicial determination of lack of capacity.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment by No. 283 inserted “including protected health information” in (c)(1) and (c)(3); added (f); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendment by No. 497 added the (d)(1) designation and added (d)(2) through (d)(8).

The 2009 amendment, in (d)(6), substituted “the allegedly maltreated adult is served with the” for “issuance of an” in (d)(6)(A), and inserted (d)(6)(C).

The 2019 amendment added (c)(2).

An unfounded hard copy report shall be destroyed one (1) year after the completion of the investigation; or

(A)Founded, a finding that shall be entered if the allegation is supported by a preponderance of the evidence.

A determination of founded but exempt shall be entered on a report if an adult practicing his or her religious beliefs is receiving spiritual treatment under § 5-28-105 or § 12-12-1704.

(1)(A)After making an investigative determination, the department shall notify in writing within ten (10) business days:

(a)The person identified as the offender.

However, in cases of unfounded self-neglect, no notice is required;

Either the:

Person identified as the maltreated person;

Legal guardian of the maltreated person; or

Natural or legal guardian of a long-term care facility resident under eighteen (18) years of age;

The current administrator of the long-term care facility if the incident occurred in a long-term care facility; and

If known by the Office of Long-Term Care, the administrator of the long-term care facility that currently employs the offender if different from the long-term care facility in which the incident occurred.

If the investigation determines that the report is founded, notification to the offender shall be by process server or by certified mail, restricted delivery.

The notification under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

The investigative determination, exclusive of the source of the notification, including the nature of the allegation and the date and time of occurrence;

A statement that an offender of a founded report has the right to an administrative hearing upon a timely request;

A statement that the request for an administrative hearing shall be made to the department within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice of determination;

A statement that the administrative hearing will be by telephone hearing unless the offender requests an in-person hearing within thirty (30) days after the date of receipt of notice of the determination;

A statement of intent to report in writing after the offender has had an opportunity for an administrative hearing the founded investigative determination to:

The Adult and Long-term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry; and

Any applicable licensing authority;

A statement that the offender's failure to request an administrative hearing in writing within thirty (30) days from the date of receipt of the notice will result in submission of the investigative report, including the investigative determination, to:

The registry; and

Any applicable licensing authority;

The consequences of waiving the right to an administrative hearing;

The consequences of a finding by a preponderance of the evidence through the administrative hearing process that the maltreatment occurred;

The fact that the offender has the right to be represented by an attorney at the offender's own expense; and

The name of the person making the notification, his or her occupation, and the location at which he or she can be reached.

(1)The administrative hearing process shall be completed within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of the receipt of the request for a hearing unless waived by the offender.

Reviewing the investigative determination of jurisdiction;

Making a final agency determination; or

Reviewing a final agency determination under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

If any party timely requests an in-person administrative hearing, the hearing officer may notify the parties that the hearing will be conducted by video conference.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “founded but exempt shall be entered on a report if” for “founded shall not be entered solely because” in (a)(2)(B); inserted (b)(2)(D) and redesignated the subsequent subdivisions accordingly; inserted (c)(6); added (e)(7); and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment deleted former (d).

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section heading and (a)(1)(B).

If the department's investigative determination of founded is upheld during the administrative hearing process or if the offender does not timely appeal for or waives the right to an administrative hearing, the department shall report the investigative determination in writing within ten (10) business days to:

(1)There is established within the Department of Human Services a statewide Adult and Long-term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry.

After notice, the offender does not timely request an administrative hearing; or

Upon completion of the administrative hearing process, the department's investigative determination of founded is upheld.

An offender's name shall remain in the registry unless:

The name is removed under a statute;

The name is removed under a rule; or

The offender prevails upon appeal.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “reports” for “allegations” in (a)(2).

This section states that an offender's name shall be placed in the registry if upon completion of the administrative hearing process, the department's investigative determination of founded is upheld. The statute makes it mandatory for the offender's name to be placed on the registry; no lesser punishment is permitted.Snyder v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 473, 559 S.W.3d 771 (2018).

The department may adopt rules necessary to encourage cooperation with other states in exchanging reports to effect a national registry system of adult maltreatment.

(1)The department may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) for researching, copying, and mailing records of the investigative files maintained under this subchapter.

A report made under this subchapter that is determined to be founded, as well as any other information obtained, including protected health information, and a report written or photograph taken concerning a founded report in the possession of the Department of Human Services shall be confidential and shall be made available only to:

Has before him or her an adult the person reasonably believes may have been maltreated; and

Requires the information to determine whether to place the adult in protective custody;

An authorized agency having responsibility for the care or supervision of an endangered person or an impaired person;

Any person who is the subject of a report or that person's legal guardian;

A grand jury or court, if the grand jury or court determines that the information is necessary for the determination of an issue before the grand jury or court;

A prosecuting attorney, law enforcement official, coroner, or the Attorney General or his or her designated investigator;

(A)An employer or volunteer agency for the purpose of screening an employee, applicant, or volunteer upon submission of a signed, notarized release from the employee, applicant, or volunteer.

The only information released to the employer or volunteer agency shall be whether or not the Adult and Long-term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry contains any founded reports naming the employee, applicant, or volunteer as an offender;

The department, including the Death Review Committee of the Department of Human Services;

The current administrator of the long-term care facility, if the incident occurred in a long-term care facility;

The administrator of the long-term care facility that currently employs the offender, if different from the long-term care facility in which the incident occurred;

A person or provider identified by the department as having services needed by the maltreated person;

Any applicable licensing or registering authority;

Any employer, legal entity, or board responsible for the person named as the offender;

Any legal entity or board responsible for the maltreated person;

A state or federal agency pursuing an official criminal records check; and

The Office of Medicaid Inspector General.

To prevent execution of a crime; or

For prosecution of a crime.

However, information contained in the registry may be made available to bona fide and approved research groups solely for the purpose of scientific research, but in no event shall the name of a person be released, nor shall specific circumstances or facts related to a specific person be used in any research report that might be identifiable with the person.

A person who knowingly permits or encourages the release of data or information contained in the registry to a person not permitted by this subchapter to receive the data or information upon conviction is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

(1)Data, records, reports, or documents released under this section to a law enforcement agency, the prosecuting attorney, or a court by the department:

Are confidential;

Shall be sealed; and

Shall not be redisclosed without a protective order.

Data, records, reports, or documents released under this section are confidential and are items of evidence for which there is a reasonable expectation of privacy that the items will not be distributed to persons or institutions without a legitimate interest in the evidence.

This subchapter does not abrogate the right of discovery in a criminal case under the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure or other applicable law.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment, in (a), inserted “including protected health information” in the introductory paragraph, and added (a)(14) through (a)(16); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment, in (e), substituted “knowingly” for “willfully,” inserted “adult and long-term care facility resident maltreatment central” and “upon conviction,” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment added (a)(17) (now (a)(15)).

The 2013 amendment repealed former (a)(7) and (a)(16);inserted “department, including the” in (a)(9) (now (a)(8)); and inserted “or agency” preceding “a report” in (b)(2).

The 2015 amendment added (a)(18) (now (a)(16)) and (f).

A record of a screened-out report of adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment shall not be disclosed except to the office of the Attorney General, the prosecuting attorney, and an appropriate law enforcement agency and may be used only within the Department of Human Services for purposes of administration of the program.

(1)A pending report, including protected health information, is confidential and shall be made available only to:

The department, including the Death Review Committee of the Department of Human Services;

A law enforcement agency;

A prosecuting attorney;

The office of the Attorney General;

A circuit court having jurisdiction pursuant to a petition for emergency, temporary, long-term protective custody, or protective services;

A grand jury or court, upon a finding that the information in the report is necessary for the determination of an issue before the grand jury or court;

A person or provider identified by the department as having services needed by the maltreated person;

Any applicable licensing or registering authority;

Any employer, legal entity, or board responsible for the person named as the offender;

Any legal entity or board responsible for the maltreated person; and

The Office of Medicaid Inspector General.

The subject of the report may only be advised that a report is pending.

Upon satisfaction of due process and if an allegation was determined to be unfounded, the investigative report, including protected health information, is confidential and shall be made available only to:

The department may retain automated information on unfounded reports for statistical purposes, to assess future risk, and to identify false reporting.

(1)Except for the subject of the report, no person or agency to which disclosure is made may disclose to any other person or agency a report or other information obtained under this section.

(1)The department may not release data that would identify the person who made a report except to law enforcement, a prosecuting attorney, or the office of the Attorney General.

To prevent commission of a crime; or

For prosecution of a crime.

Data, records, reports, or documents released under this section to a law enforcement agency, the prosecuting attorney, or a court by the department:

Are confidential;

Shall be sealed; and

Shall not be redisclosed without a protective order.

Data, records, reports, or documents released under this section are confidential and are items of evidence for which there is a reasonable expectation of privacy that the items will not be distributed to persons or institutions without a legitimate interest in the evidence.

This subchapter does not abrogate the right of discovery in a criminal case under the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure or other applicable law.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment inserted “including protected health information” in (a)(1) and (b); added (a)(1)(I) through (a)(1)(K), (b)(10) through (b)(12), and (d); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment inserted (a) and redesignated the subsequent subsections accordingly; deleted “screened out report or a” preceding “pending report” in (b)(1); substituted “satisfaction of due process” for “completion of the administrative hearing process” in (c); added (f); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment deleted (b)(1)(K) and (c)(12); rewrote (d); and inserted “or agency” preceding “a report” in (e)(1).

The 2015 amendment added (b)(1)(K), (c)(12), and (g).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1.

12-12-1707. Adult and long-term care facility resident maltreatment hotline.

The Department of Human Services shall maintain a single statewide telephone number that all persons, whether mandated by law or not, may use to report a case of suspected adult maltreatment and long-term care facility resident maltreatment.

When appropriate, a copy of the initial report shall immediately be made available to the appropriate law enforcement agency for its consideration.

(1)The department shall not release information that would identify the person who made the report unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders release of the information after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found that disclosure is necessary:

To prevent execution of a crime; or

For prosecution of a crime.

(A)However, any person to whom the name of the reporter is disclosed is prohibited from redisclosing this information, except as provided in subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this section.

(i)Upon request, the information shall be disclosed to:

The Attorney General;

The prosecuting attorney; or

Law enforcement officers.

However, the information shall remain confidential until criminal charges are filed.

(1)A report of an allegation of suspected adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment shall be accepted if the allegation, if true, would constitute adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment and so long as sufficient identifying information is provided to identify and locate the victim.

A report to the hotline when the allegation, even if true, would not constitute adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment shall be screened out.

(1)The hotline shall accept a report if the victim or offender is present in Arkansas or if the incident occurred in Arkansas.

If the incident occurred in another state, the hotline shall screen out the report and transfer the report to the hotline of the state in which the incident occurred.

Upon request from an adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment investigator in another state, the department shall complete courtesy interviews with the victim, offender, or any witness of adult maltreatment who resides in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1.

12-12-1708. Persons required to report adult or long-term care facility resident maltreatment.

(1)Whenever any of the following persons has observed or has reasonable cause to suspect that an endangered person or an impaired person has been subjected to conditions or circumstances that constitute adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment, the person shall immediately report or cause a report to be made in accordance with the provisions of this section:

A physician;

A surgeon;

A coroner;

A dentist;

A dental hygienist;

An osteopath;

A resident intern;

A nurse;

A member of a hospital's personnel who is engaged in the administration, examination, care, or treatment of persons;

A social worker;

A case manager;

A home health worker;

A mental health professional;

A peace officer;

A law enforcement officer;

A facility administrator or owner;

An employee in a facility;

An employee of the Department of Human Services, with the exception of an employee working with an ombudsman program established by the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services, in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2017;

A firefighter;

An emergency medical technician;

An employee of a bank or other financial institution;

An employee of the United States Postal Service;

An employee or a volunteer of a program or an organization funded partially or wholly by the department who enters the home of or has contact with an elderly person;

A person associated with the care and treatment of animals, such as animal control officers and humane society officials;

An employee who enforces code requirements for a city, township, or municipality;

Any clergy member, including without limitation, a minister, a priest, a rabbi, an accredited Christian Science practitioner, or any other similar functionary of a religious organization, or an individual reasonably believed to be a minister, a priest, a rabbi, an accredited Christian Science practitioner, or any other similar functionary of a religious organization by the person consulting him or her, except to the extent he or she:

Has acquired knowledge of suspected maltreatment through communications required to be kept confidential pursuant to the religious discipline of the relevant denomination or faith; or

Received the knowledge of the suspected maltreatment from the offender in the context of a statement of admission; or

An employee working under contract for, or a contractor of, the Department of Human Services when acting within the scope of his or her contract or employment.

Whenever a person is required to report under this subchapter in his or her capacity as a member of the staff, an employee in or owner of a facility, or an employee of the department, he or she shall immediately notify the person in charge of the institution, facility, or agency, or that person's designated agent, who shall then become responsible for making a report or cause a report to be made within twenty-four (24) hours or on the next business day, whichever is earlier.

In addition to those persons and officials required to report suspected maltreatment, any other person may make a report if the person has observed an adult or long-term care facility resident being maltreated or has reasonable cause to suspect that an adult or long-term care facility resident has been maltreated.

(1)A report for a long-term care facility resident shall be made:

Immediately to the local law enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which the long-term care facility is located; and

To the Office of Long-Term Care, under rules of that office.

A report of a maltreated adult who does not reside in a long-term care facility shall be made to the adult and long-term care facility maltreatment hotline provided in §12-12-1707.

No privilege or contract shall relieve any person required by this subchapter to make a notification or report from the requirement of making the notification or report.

(1)Upon request the department shall provide a person listed in subdivision (a)(1) of this section with confirmation of receipt of a report of maltreatment.

However, confirmation shall consist only of the acknowledgement of receipt of the report and the date the report was made to the department.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2007, No. 497, § 5; 2013, No. 584, § 3; 2017, No. 1034, § 1; 2019, No. 531, § 2;
2019, No. 315, § 872.

12-12-1709. Report of death caused by maltreatment.

(1)Any person or official who is required to report a case of suspected adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment under this subchapter and who has reasonable cause to suspect that an adult or long-term care facility resident has died as a result of maltreatment shall report the suspected death from maltreatment to the appropriate medical examiner or coroner.

(A)In all cases of the death of a long-term care facility resident or a hospice facility resident, the long-term care facility or the hospice facility shall immediately report the death to the appropriate coroner.

The report is required regardless of whether the long-term care facility or the hospice facility believes the death to be from natural causes or the result of maltreatment or any other cause.

(A)In all cases of the death in a hospital of a person who was a long-term care facility resident within five (5) days before entering the hospital, the hospital shall immediately report the death to the appropriate coroner.

The report is required regardless of whether the hospital believes the death to be from natural causes, the result of maltreatment, or any other cause.

(1)The medical examiner or coroner shall accept the report for investigation and upon finding reasonable cause to suspect that a person has died as a result of maltreatment shall report the findings to a law enforcement agency and the appropriate prosecuting attorney.

If the institution making the report is a hospital or long-term care facility, the medical examiner or coroner shall report the findings to the hospital or long-term care facility unless the findings are part of a pending or ongoing law enforcement investigation.

If it receives findings under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the medical examiner, coroner, or hospital shall also report findings under subsection (b) of this section to the Department of Human Services if:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1.

12-12-1710. Investigation by Department of Human Services.

The Department of Human Services shall have jurisdiction to investigate all cases of suspected maltreatment of an endangered person or an impaired person.

(1)The Adult Protective Services Unit of the Department of Human Services shall investigate:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2013, No. 584, § 4; 2019, No. 967, § 1.

12-12-1711. Procedures for investigation by the Department of Human Services.

The Department of Human Services shall conduct a thorough investigation of all suspected adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment in accordance with this subchapter.

(1)The investigation shall be completed and an investigative determination entered within sixty (60) days.

The investigation shall be conducted by an examination and review of the allegations and any other information concerning suspected adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment received by or collected by the department from any source.

The investigation and written investigative report shall include:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2019, No. 967, § 2.

12-12-1712. Photographs and X-rays.

Upon notification under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the person in charge of the institution or agency or his or her designee shall:

The department is not required to pay for a photograph or X-ray or a copy of a photograph or X-ray taken under this section.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2019, No. 955, § 1.

12-12-1713. Immunity for investigation participants.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1.

12-12-1714. Investigative powers of the Department of Human Services.

Upon request, financial records maintained by a bank or similar institution regarding a maltreated person shall be made available to the department for the purpose of conducting an investigation under this subchapter.

A circuit court, upon good cause shown, shall order any facility or person that maintains medical, mental health, or other records, including protected health information, regarding a maltreated person to tender the records to the department for the purpose of conducting an investigation under this subchapter.

(1)An investigation under this subchapter may include a medical, psychological, social, vocational, financial, and educational evaluation and review, if necessary.

(A)(i)The department may file an ex parte petition in circuit court requesting an order of investigation.

If the court issues an order of investigation, any subsequent petition for custody shall be filed in this same case.

If before an investigation under this subchapter is completed, the Adult Protective Services Unit of the Department of Human Services determines that the immediate removal of a maltreated adult is necessary to protect the maltreated adult from imminent danger to his or her health or safety, the unit may:

Petition a circuit court for an order of temporary custody; or

Exercise a seventy-two-hour hold under the Adult Maltreatment Custody Act, §9-20-101 et seq.

Upon petition by the department, the court may direct payment from the assets of the allegedly maltreated adult for services rendered or goods purchased by or for the allegedly maltreated adult during the course of the investigation.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2007, No. 283, § 8; 2007, No. 497, § 6; 2009, No. 525, § 2; 2019, No. 955, § 2.